Colorado, session 2026A, SB124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-539, amend
(3)(d), (3)(e), and (4); and repeal (3)(f) as follows:
24-33.5-539. Automated protection order notification system -
definitions.
(3) The automated protection order notification system must include,
but is not limited to, the following information, if available:
(d) Whether an extreme risk protection order was issued against the
restrained person pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13, and if so, the date the
extreme risk protection order was served or was attempted to be served;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

AND
(e) Whether the restrained person applied for and was denied the
purchase or transfer of a firearm as the result of a background check. and
(f) Whether the restrained person completed and submitted a firearm
purchase or transfer application that indicated the restrained person was
ineligible to possess a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.
(4) The Colorado bureau of investigation in the division
DEPARTMENT AND THE COLORADO INTEGRATED CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INFORMATION SYSTEM PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 16-20.5-103 shall
make the information described in subsection (3) of this section available
to the division for the purpose of providing the information to a protected
person, the protected person's immediate family, or other interested persons
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-124

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-124